sv: Chokladtyp: Mörk choklad; Mjölkchoklad; Vit choklad; Övrigt
el: Τύπος σοκολάτας: Μαύρη σοκολάτα; Σοκολάτα γάλακτος; Λευκή σοκολάτα; Άλλο
da: Chokoladetype: Mørk chokolade; Mælkechokolade; Hvid chokolade; Andet
ro-RO: Tip ciocolată: Ciocolată neagră; Ciocolată cu lapte; Ciocolată albă; Altele
th: ประเภทช็อคโกแลต: ดาร์กช็อกโกแลต; ช็อกโกแลตนม; ไวต์ช็อกโกแลต; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta čokolade: Temna čokolada; Mlečna čokolada; Bela čokolada; Drugo
nb: Sjokoladetype: Mørk sjokolade; Melkesjokolade; Hvit sjokolade; Annet
zh-CN: 巧克力类型: 黑巧克力; 牛奶巧克力; 白巧克力; 其他
en: Chocolate type: Dark chocolate; Milk chocolate; White chocolate; Other
it: Tipo di cioccolato: Cioccolato fondente; Cioccolato al latte; Cioccolato bianco; Altro
lt-LT: Šokolado tipas: Juodasis šokoladas; Pieniškas šokoladas; Baltasis šokoladas; Kita
cs: Typ čokolády: Tmavá čokoláda; Mléčná čokoláda; Bílá čokoláda; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ čokolády: Horká čokoláda; Mliečna čokoláda; Biela čokoláda; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de chocolate: Chocolate negro; Chocolate de leite; Chocolate quente; Outro
tr: Çikolata türü: Bitter çikolata; Sütlü çikolata; Beyaz çikolata; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta čokolade: Tamna čokolada; Mliječna čokolada; Bijela čokolada; Ostalo
pl: Typ czekolady: Gorąca czekolada; Czekolada mleczna; Czekolada biała; Inne
zh-TW: 巧克力類型: 黑巧克力; 牛奶巧克力; 白巧克力; 其他
vi: Loại sô-cô-la: Sô-cô-la nóng; Sô-cô-la sữa; Sô-cô-la trắng; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de chocolate: Chocolate amargo; Chocolate ao leite; Chocolate branco; Outro
de: Schokoladensorte: Dunkle Schokolade; Vollmilchschokolade; Weiße Schokolade; Sonstiges
fi: Suklaatyyppi: Tumma suklaa; Maitosuklaa; Valkoinen suklaa; Muu
fr: Type de chocolat: Chocolat noir; Chocolat au lait; Chocolat blanc; Autre
ko: 초콜릿 유형: 다크 초콜릿; 밀크 초콜릿; 화이트 초콜릿; 기타
ja: チョコレートのタイプ: ダークチョコレート; ミルクチョコレート; ホワイトチョコレート; その他
ru: Тип шоколада: Темный шоколад; Молочный шоколад; Белый шоколад; Другое
nl: Type chocolade: Pure chocolade; Melkchocolade; Witte chocolade; Andere
es: Tipo de chocolate: Chocolate amargo; Chocolate con leche; Chocolate blanco; Otros
bg-BG: Тип шоколад: Черен шоколад; Млечен шоколад; Бял шоколад; Други
hu: Csokoládé típusa: Étcsokoládé; Tejcsokoládé; Fehércsokoládé; Egyéb